apertium-id-ms.id.metadix
    <pardef n="diakal/i__n">
    <e c="di-i, di-kan">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajar/__n">
    <e c="di-, di-i, di-kan">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- di- (Adj -> V) -->
    <pardef n="diacak/__adj">
    <e c="di-">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diadil/i__adj">
    <e c="di-i">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dihormat/__adj">
    <e c="di-, di-i">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diabsah/kan__adj">
    <e c="di-kan">
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diabadi/__adj">
    <e c="di-, di-kan">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dibaru/i__adj">
    <e c="di-i, di-kan">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dikalah/__adj">
    <e c="di-, di-i, di-kan">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- ber- -->
    <pardef n="beragama__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berbicara__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ber"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berbahagia__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berlangsung__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- ber-an -->
    <pardef n="berpahaman__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berkekalan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- ber-kan -->
    <pardef n="berorientasikan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- ter- -->
    <pardef n="tertawa__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ter"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tertidur__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ter"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- memper- (V -> V) -->
    <pardef n="memperbuat/__vblex">
    <e c="memper-">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperdengar/kan__vblex">
    <e c="memper-kan">
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mempergantung/i__vblex">
    <e c="memper-i">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperikut/__vblex">
    <e c="memper-, memper-kan">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="buah"><p><l>dibuah</l><r>buah</r></p><par n="diakal/i__n" prm="buah"/></e>
    <e lm="laba"><p><l>dilaba</l><r>laba</r></p><par n="diakal/i__n" prm="laba"/></e>
    <e lm="tawa"><p><l>ditawa</l><r>tawa</r></p><par n="diakal/i__n" prm="tawa"/></e>
    <e lm="gema"><p><l>digema</l><r>gema</r></p><par n="diajar/__n" prm="gema"/></e>
    <e lm="perintah"><p><l>diperintah</l><r>perintah</r></p><par n="diajar/__n" prm="perintah"/></e>
    <e lm="tanya"><p><l>ditanya</l><r>tanya</r></p><par n="diajar/__n" prm="tanya"/></e>
    <e lm="comot"><p><l>dicomot</l><r>comot</r></p><par n="diacak/__adj" prm="comot"/></e>
    <e lm="iri"><p><l>diiri</l><r>iri</r></p><par n="diacak/__adj" prm="iri"/></e>
    <e lm="peka"><p><l>dipeka</l><r>peka</r></p><par n="diacak/__adj" prm="peka"/></e>
    <e lm="jahil"><p><l>dijahil</l><r>jahil</r></p><par n="diadil/i__adj" prm="jahil"/></e>
    <e lm="nakal"><p><l>dinakal</l><r>nakal</r></p><par n="diadil/i__adj" prm="nakal"/></e>
    <e lm="sepakat"><p><l>disepakat</l><r>sepakat</r></p><par n="diadil/i__adj" prm="sepakat"/></e>
    <e lm="ceroboh"><p><l>diceroboh</l><r>ceroboh</r></p><par n="dihormat/__adj" prm="ceroboh"/></e>
    <e lm="lampau"><p><l>dilampau</l><r>lampau</r></p><par n="dihormat/__adj" prm="lampau"/></e>
    <e lm="sobek"><p><l>disobek</l><r>sobek</r></p><par n="dihormat/__adj" prm="sobek"/></e>
    <e lm="gilap"><p><l>digilap</l><r>gilap</r></p><par n="diabsah/kan__adj" prm="gilap"/></e>
    <e lm="lamban"><p><l>dilamban</l><r>lamban</r></p><par n="diabsah/kan__adj" prm="lamban"/></e>
    <e lm="sembrono"><p><l>disembrono</l><r>sembrono</r></p><par n="diabsah/kan__adj" prm="sembrono"/></e>
    <e lm="galak"><p><l>digalak</l><r>galak</r></p><par n="diabadi/__adj" prm="galak"/></e>
    <e lm="labuh"><p><l>dilabuh</l><r>labuh</r></p><par n="diabadi/__adj" prm="labuh"/></e>
    <e lm="simbah"><p><l>disimbah</l><r>simbah</r></p><par n="diabadi/__adj" prm="simbah"/></e>
    <e lm="gemar"><p><l>digemar</l><r>gemar</r></p><par n="dibaru/i__adj" prm="gemar"/></e>
    <e lm="lengkap"><p><l>dilengkap</l><r>lengkap</r></p><par n="dibaru/i__adj" prm="lengkap"/></e>
    <e lm="jauh"><p><l>dijauh</l><r>jauh</r></p><par n="dikalah/__adj" prm="jauh"/></e>
    <e lm="panas"><p><l>dipanas</l><r>panas</r></p><par n="dikalah/__adj" prm="panas"/></e>
    <e lm="kilat"><p><l>berkilat</l><r>kilat</r></p><par n="beragama__n"/></e>
    <e lm="toko"><p><l>bertoko</l><r>toko</r></p><par n="beragama__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jalan"><p><l>berjalan</l><r>jalan</r></p><par n="berbicara__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="main"><p><l>bermain</l><r>main</r></p><par n="berbicara__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bahagia"><p><l>berbahagia</l><r>bahagia</r></p><par n="berbahagia__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sama"><p><l>bersama</l><r>sama</r></p><par n="berbahagia__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="langsung"><p><l>berlangsung</l><r>langsung</r></p><par n="berlangsung__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kait"><p><l>berkaitan</l><r>kait</r></p><par n="berpahaman__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asas"><p><l>berasaskan</l><r>asas</r></p><par n="berorientasikan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diri"><p><l>terdiri</l><r>diri</r></p><par n="tertawa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="letak"><p><l>terletak</l><r>letak</r></p><par n="tertawa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tawa"><p><l>tertawa</l><r>tawa</r></p><par n="tertawa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sebut"><p><l>tersebut</l><r>sebut</r></p><par n="tertidur__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tarik"><p><l>tertarik</l><r>tarik</r></p><par n="tertidur__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gegas"><p><l>mempergegas</l><r>gegas</r></p><par n="memperbuat/__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hidup"><p><l>memperhidup</l><r>hidup</r></p><par n="memperbuat/__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kitar"><p><l>memperkitar</l><r>kitar</r></p><par n="memperdengar/kan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tangguh"><p><l>mempertangguh</l><r>tangguh</r></p><par n="memperdengar/kan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hias"><p><l>memperhias</l><r>hias</r></p><par n="mempergantung/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lindung"><p><l>memperlindung</l><r>lindung</r></p><par n="mempergantung/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ikut"><p><l>memperikut</l><r>ikut</r></p><par n="memperikut/__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tetap"><p><l>mempertetap</l><r>tetap</r></p><par n="memperikut/__vblex"/></e>
